District of Columbia statutes.
29-917

Voting provisions — Application to voting by delegates.

If an association has provided for voting by delegates, any provision of this chapter referring to votes cast by the members shall apply to votes cast by delegates, but this shall not permit delegates to vote by mail or electronic mail.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(9), 59 DCR 13171
2001 Ed., § 29-917.
1981 Ed., § 29-1117.
1973 Ed., § 29-817.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added “or electronic mail” at the end of the section.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.